Louisiana, session 2026, HB688.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:8(70)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§8. Definitions
For purposes of this Chapter, the following words and phrases have the
meaning ascribed to them in this Section, unless the context clearly shows a different
meaning:
* * *
(70) "Game fish" means all of the following species of freshwater and
saltwater fish:
* * *
(b) Saltwater game fish means any sailfish (Istiopharus Istiophorus
platypterus), blue marlin (Makaira indica nigricans), black marlin (Makaira
nigricans Istiompax indica), striped marlin (Tetrapturus Kajikia audax), hatchet
marlin or roundscale spearfish (Tetrapturus spp. georgii), white marlin (Tetrapturus
albidus Kajikia albida), and red drum (Sciaenops ocellatus), and Atlantic tarpon
(Megalops atlanticus).
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 688 ENROLLED
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.